Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Chapter 13. Assaults

§§ 601-607.
Repealed.
1971, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 608.
Assault and robbery.

A person who assaults another and robs, steals, or takes from his or her person or in his or her presence money or other property that may be the subject of larceny shall be imprisoned for not more than 10 years.

A person who, being armed with a dangerous weapon, assaults another and robs, steals, or takes from his or her person or in his or her presence money or other property that may be the subject of larceny shall be imprisoned for not more than 15 years nor less than one year.

If in the attempt or commission of an offense under subsection (a) or (b) of this section, a person causes bodily injury, such person shall be imprisoned for not more than 20 years nor less than one year. Any penalty imposed under this subsection shall be in lieu of any penalty imposed under subsection (a) or (b) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added 1973, No. 73, eff. 30 days from April 14, 1973.